Utah statutes.
34-26-2.   Claim -- Notice.

Any such employee, laborer or servant desiring to enforce his claim for wages under this chapter shall present a statement under oath to the officer, person or court charged with such property within 10 days after the seizure of it on any process, or within 30 days after the same may have been placed in the hands of any receiver, assignee or trustee, showing the amount due after allowing all just credits and setoffs, the kind of work for which such wages are due and when performed. Any person with whom any such claim shall have been filed shall give immediate notice thereof by mail to all persons interested, and, if the claim is not contested as provided in Section 34-26-3, it shall be the duty of the person or the court receiving such statement to pay the amount of such claim or claims to the person or persons entitled thereto, after first paying all costs occasioned by the seizure of such property, out of the proceeds of the sale of the property seized.

